Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.305, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Reporting requirements. (a) Reporting of state assessment results must: (1) provide timely, useful, and understandable information on the performance of individual students, schools, school districts, and the state; (2) include a growth indicator of student achievement; and (3) determine whether students have met the state's academic standards. (b) The commissioner must ensure that for annual computer-adaptive assessments: (1) individual student performance data and achievement reports are available within three school days of when students take an assessment except in a year when an assessment reflects new performance standards; (2) growth information is available for each student from the student's first assessment to each proximate assessment using a constant measurement scale; (3) parents, teachers, and school administrators are able to use elementary and middle school student performance data to project students' secondary and postsecondary achievement; and (4) useful diagnostic information about areas of students' academic strengths and weaknesses is available to teachers and school administrators for improving student instruction and indicating the specific skills and concepts that should be introduced and developed for students at given performance levels, organized by strands within subject areas, and aligned to state academic standards. (c) The commissioner, in consultation with the chancellor of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities, must establish empirically derived benchmarks on the high school tests that reveal a trajectory toward career and college readiness consistent with section 136F.302, subdivision 1a. The commissioner must disseminate to the public the computer-adaptive assessments and high school test results upon receiving those results. (d) A school, school district, or charter school may provide a student's parent access to the student's individual student performance data and achievement report that is made available under paragraph (b), clause (1), when the performance data and report is available to the school, school district, or charter school. new text begin (e) An individual student report of state assessment results must include the number and percent of days the student was absent from school the previous school year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end